Idaho, session 2026, S1310.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 69, Title 39, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 69
HUMAN FETAL TISSUE IN PRODUCTS
39-6901. HUMAN FETAL TISSUE IN PRODUCTS. (1) All products that use any
ingredients or additives that have been subjected to the use of human fetal
tissue in the testing or production phase shall include explicit labeling
indicating inclusion of human fetal tissue in the research, production, or
development of the product.
(2) The provisions of this section shall apply to any vaccination or
medical product that includes human fetal tissue and shall apply to products
where testing was performed on the final product, or its components or mate-
rials, or to the specific production lot or batch of the product, or its com-
ponents or materials.
(3) Manufacturers shall be strictly liable for a violation of the pro-
visions of subsection (1) of this section. Retailers shall be liable only if
they had actual knowledge that the product required labeling as provided in
subsection (1) of this section and failed to do so.
(4) When the attorney general has reason to believe that any person or
entity is violating or has violated the requirements of this section, the
attorney general may bring an action to obtain injunctive relief and civil
penalties of up to five thousand dollars ($5,000) per violation or up to five
percent (5%) of the gross revenue derived from the sale of the violating
product in this state while such sales were in violation. The injunction
shall be sufficient to prevent the defendant from violating the requirements
of this section.
(5)(a) It shall be an affirmative defense that:
(i) Consumers have been conspicuously informed while purchasing
that the product has been subjected to the use of human fetal tis-
sue, such as:
1. For online sales, by a prominent display on the website
the product was ordered from; or
2. For in-person sales, by being informed vocally;


(ii) A manufacturer established and maintained written policies
reasonably designed to ensure compliance with the provisions of
subsection (1) of this section, including verification from in-
gredient suppliers, and informed retailers of such policies; and
(iii) A retailer relied in good faith on the labeling provided by a
manufacturer.
(b) It shall not be an affirmative defense that the manufacturer or re-
tailer is not based in this state.
(6) As used in this section, "human fetal tissue" means tissue or cells
obtained from a dead human embryo or fetus after a spontaneous or induced
abortion or after a stillbirth and includes any fetal cell, embryonic cell,
or cell line derived from a fetal or embryonic cell and any derivative bio-
logical matter such as deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) or proteins originating
from such tissue, cells, or cell lines.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.